Hawaii statutes.
§147-55 Department, notice of hearing.
In establishing and prescribing the standards, or any alterations or
modifications to the standards, the department of agriculture shall call a
public hearing and give notice thereof in conformity with chapter 91. [L 1947,
c 195, §5; RL 1955, §22-44; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; am
L 1965, c 96, §20; HRS §147-55]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next